test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_A_NoExtra_pikwan_gt-norm.yaml
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: pikwanenhimishiniibanag
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: pikwanenhimishiniibaning
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: pikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: pikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: pikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nipikwanensimishinaanibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nipikwanensimishinaanibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nipikwanensimishinaanibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nipikwanensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nipikwanensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nipikwanensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nipikwanensimishiniibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nipikwanensimishiniibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nipikwanensimishiniibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nipikwanenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nipikwanenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nipikwanenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nipikwanenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nipikwanenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nipikwanenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nipikwanenhimishiniibanan
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nipikwanenhimishiniibanag
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nipikwanenhimishiniibaning
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nipikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nipikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nipikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gipikwanensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gipikwanensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gipikwanensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gipikwanensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gipikwanensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gipikwanensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gipikwanensimishiniibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gipikwanensimishiniibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gipikwanensimishiniibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gipikwanenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gipikwanenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gipikwanenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gipikwanenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gipikwanenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gipikwanenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gipikwanenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gipikwanenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gipikwanenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gipikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gipikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gipikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: opikwanensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: opikwanensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: opikwanensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: opikwanensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: opikwanensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: opikwanensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: opikwanensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: opikwanensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: opikwanensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: opikwanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: opikwanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: opikwanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: opikwanensimishiniibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: opikwanensimishiniibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: opikwanensimishiniibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: opikwanensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: opikwanensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: opikwanensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: opikwanenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: opikwanenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: opikwanenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: opikwanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: opikwanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: opikwanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: opikwanenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: opikwanenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: opikwanenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: opikwanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: opikwanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: opikwanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: opikwanenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: opikwanenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: opikwanenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: opikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: opikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: opikwanenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
